src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ALLAT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:a%> ATTR ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +A+Comp+Attr:i%>X4t K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4buš%> ATTRCONT ; 
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:i»X4bužž%> K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:i»X4bužž%> R ;			! test this
! +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+SgGenCmp:i»X4bužž%> R ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>eappo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>eappo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>abbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>abbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X4busa%> PxV ;
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4buiddá%> Px1V ;
 +A+Superl+Attr:i%>X4mus K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:i%>X4muss%> K ;
 +A+Superl+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:i%>X4muss%> R ;			! test this
 +A+Superl+SgGenCmp:i%>X4muss%> R ;
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4mussa%> PxV ;
 +A+Superl+Ess+Use/Sub:i%>X4mussa%>n%> PxC ;
 +A+Superl:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +A:ad ALLAGA ;
 +A+Use/NG:ag ALLAGA ;
 +A:ad%> ADVC ;
 +A+Use/NG:ag%> ADVC ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:i%>X4musat K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:i%>X4but K ;


LEXICON ALLAGA !!= * __@CODE@__
 00:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ; !^B^ doesn't work ...
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
! +SgNomCmp#+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.





!! !!Contracted adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON FIINNIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-dná-(:Ø)#fiinna
 +A:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ; ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 


 LEXICON DEAHTIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  as fiinnis, but with StrGr in Attr
 +A:%>a ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;

LEXICON SMAVIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  as deahtis, but with even more Attr forms
 +A+Comp:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! smávit
 +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! smávimus
 +A:ás%> ADVC ;
 +A:%>a ATTR ;
 +A+Use/NG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Use/NG:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 

LEXICON STUORIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  As fiinnis, but with different comparation
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:a%>X4 ATTR ; ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:á%>Y5t K ;
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-KJ:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorit 
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-GG:á%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorát 
 +A+Superl+Dial/%-KJ:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorimus  
 +A+Superl+Dial/%-GG:á%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorámus 
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;

LEXICON NJALGGAT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:ah%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ; ! 
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 

LEXICON CAPPIS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 

LEXICON VIISSIS   !!= * __@CODE@__  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es/-is
 +A+Dial/%-GG:es%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:is%>X4 ATTR ; ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-KJ:át SHORTCOMP ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ; ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;  ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; ! 
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ; ! 
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 
 
LEXICON RAHPIS   !!= * __@CODE@__  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es
 +A:es%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Comp:át SHORTCOMP ;
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Use/Sub:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 


! -------------
!! !!Special cases
! -------------

LEXICON VEARA_PO !!= * __@CODE@__
 +veara+Po:% veara%> K ;
 +veara+A+Attr:% veara%> K ;
 +veara+Po:% veara%>n K ;



LEXICON VEARA !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:»veara%> K ;
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Attr+Use/Sub:»veara%> K ;
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Sg+Ess+Use/Sub:»veara%>n K ;




!! !!Final note on the adjective sublexica
!-------------------------------------

!! todo: Rewrite the adj lexica so that the attr variation is kept separate
!! from the otherwise uniform declension.



! ---------------------------
!! !!!Sublexica for nominal stems
! ---------------------------



!! !!Declension
! ----------


!! !Noun declension
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON DEVNVCASE  !!= * @CODE@  
 GOAHTI-NEadj ;
 GOAHTI-OBLadj ;
 
LEXICON GOAHTI-OBLadj  !!= * @CODE@  
 +Use/Sub:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADIadj- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODIIadj- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODIIadj- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Use/Sub:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +Use/Sub:X8 GOADE- ; ! ! Ditto (?)
 +Use/Sub: GOAHTE- ;	!

LEXICON GOAHTI-NE  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns; Nominative Sg. and Essive
 NomV ;
 EssV ;

LEXICON NomV !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +SgNomCmp: R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;


LEXICON EssV !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Ped:n%> PxC ;
 
LEXICON GOAHTI-NEadj !!= * __@CODE@__
 NomVadj ;
 EssVadj ;

LEXICON NomVadj  !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: Px3V ;
 +SgNomCmp: R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;


LEXICON EssVadj !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n%> PxC ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-OBL !!= * __@CODE@__
! :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ; 
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:X2 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:X2s%> PxC ;
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
 
LEXICON GOAHTI-OBL-FULLPX !!= * __@CODE@__
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)


LEXICON GOAHTI-IU-OBL !!= * __@CODE@__
! :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:X2 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:X2s%> PxC ;
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON GOAHTI-IU-OBL-FULLPX !!= * __@CODE@__
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
