src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpevissis+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Dial/%-GG+CmpN/First:eahpe#vis's VIISSIS ;
LEXICON Adjective
allat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:all ALLAT ;
deahtis:deahtt DEAHTIS ;
fiinnis:fijdn FIINNIS "fine A" ;
friskkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fris'k DEAHTIS ;
gassat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gass ALLAT ;
govdat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gov'd ALLAT ;
jáfofiinnis:jáfo7#fijdn FIINNIS ;
neahtis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:neahtt DEAHTIS ;
njálggat:njál'g NJALGGAT "sweet A" ;
njálggis:njál'g CAPPIS ;
rikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rigg VIISSIS ;
guollerikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guolle#rigg VIISSIS ;
dáhpáhusrikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáhpáhus#rigg VIISSIS ;
ráhpis:ráhpp RAHPIS ;
smávis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:smávv SMAVIS ;
sroaŋggis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sroaŋ'g DEAHTIS ;
stroaŋggis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stroaŋ'g DEAHTIS ;
stuoris+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuorr STUORIS ;
super-čáppat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:super-čább NJALGGAT ;
sátnerikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sátne#rigg VIISSIS ;
teahtis:teahtt DEAHTIS ;
viiddis:vij'd VIISSIS ;
viissis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vij's VIISSIS ;
vissis+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Dial/%-GG:vis's VIISSIS ;
árrat+A:árrad ALLAGA ;
čoaskkis:čoas'k DEAHTIS ;
čáppat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čább NJALGGAT ;
čáppis:čább CAPPIS "beautiful A" ;
